Hawaii statutes.
§96-9 Investigation procedures. (a)
In an investigation, the ombudsman may make inquiries and obtain information as
the ombudsman thinks fit, enter without notice to inspect the premises of an
agency, and hold private hearings.

(b) The ombudsman is required to maintain
secrecy in respect to all matters and the identities of the complainants or
witnesses coming before the ombudsman except so far as disclosures may be
necessary to enable the ombudsman to carry out the ombudsman's duties and to
support the ombudsman's recommendations. [L 1967, c 306, §10; HRS §96-9; gen ch
1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next